Florida, session 2026, SB1412.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 19 20 Section 1.âThis act may be cited as the âOn-the-Job 21 Workforce Training Act.â 22 Section 2.âSubsection (3) of section 448.110, Florida 23 Statutes, is amended to read: 24 448.110âState minimum wage; annual wage adjustment; 25 enforcement.â 26 (3)(a)âEmployers shall pay employees a minimum wage at an 27 hourly rate of $6.15 for all hours worked in Florida. Only those 28 individuals entitled to receive the federal minimum wage under 29 the federal Fair Labor Standards Act, as amended, and its 30 implementing regulations shall be eligible to receive the state 31 minimum wage pursuant to s. 24, Art. X of the State Constitution 32 and this section. The provisions of ss. 213 and 214 of the 33 federal Fair Labor Standards Act, as interpreted by applicable 34 federal regulations and implemented by the Secretary of Labor, 35 are incorporated herein. 36 (b)âAn employer is not subject to the state minimum wage 37 requirements of this section for an employee who is in a 38 structured work-study program, internship, preapprenticeship 39 program, or other similar work-based learning opportunity and 40 who opts out of receiving the minimum wage. However, such work 41 based learning opportunity may not last longer than 9 months or 42 two full-time semesters consisting of at least 15 credit hours 43 each. 44 (c)âAn employee may opt out of receiving the state minimum 45 wage by voluntarily signing a waiver of his or her right to the 46 state minimum wage established under this subsection. The waiver 47 must state that the employee acknowledges his or her right to 48 the state minimum wage pursuant to s. 24, Art. X of the State 49 Constitution and this section and that the employee is knowingly 50 and voluntarily choosing to receive a lesser amount for his or 51 her work-based learning opportunity as described in paragraph 52 (b). An employer may not coerce an employee to opt out of 53 receiving the state minimum wage. If the employee is younger 54 than 18 years of age, in order for the waiver to be effective, 55 the employeeâs parent or guardian must have agreed and signed 56 the waiver on behalf of the minor employee at the minor 57 employeeâs request. 58 (d)âExcept as provided in paragraphs (b) and (c), an 59 employer must pay an employee a wage at or above the federal 60 minimum wage. 61 (e)âAn employeeâs waiver to opt out of the state minimum 62 wage under this subsection is only valid for 9 months after the 63 date his or her employment with the employer begins. Thereafter, 64 the employee must be paid at or above the state minimum wage 65 regardless of his or her position or job title with the 66 employer. 67 Section 3.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.